Utah statutes.
53-7-215.   Portable fire extinguishers -- Persons not subject to part.

(1)  The filling or charging of portable fire extinguishers prior to initial sale by the manufacturer is not subject to this part.

(2)  Any firm that maintains its own fully equipped and specially staffed fire prevention, fire protection, and fire extinguisher servicing facilities is not subject to the licensing provisions of this part if it services only its own portable fire extinguishers.

(3)  Individuals shall maintain a current certificate of registration.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

